Louisiana, session 2026, SB269.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:282.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§282.3. Success sequence
A. The legislature finds and declares that data from the United States
Bureau of Labor Statistics National Longitudinal Survey of Youth and scientific
studies show the following evidence is established:
(1) Married couples who have children have higher family incomes and
lower poverty rates than their unmarried counterparts. The 2021 census data
showed that less than ten percent of children in two-parent homes lived in
poverty, while more than thirty percent of children in single-parent homes lived
in poverty.
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-190 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 269
(2) Over the past forty-five years, the number of children living with
married parents has declined significantly.
(3) Children that are reared in stable, married-parent families are more
likely to excel in school, and generally earn higher grade point averages than
children who are not.
(4) Children that are reared by married parents are approximately twice
as likely to graduate from college than children who are not.
(5) Children that are not reared in a home with married parents are
statistically twice as likely to end up in jail or prison before reaching thirty
years of age.
(6) Children that are reared by a single parent are more than three times
as likely to live in poverty than children raised by married parents.
(7) Among millennials who finished high school, entered the workforce,
and were married before having children, ninety-seven percent did not live in
poverty when they reached adulthood.
B. The purpose of this Section is to decrease the likelihood that students
will grow to adulthood and repeat the patterns that have been statistically
proven to increase rates of poverty.
C. As used in this Section, "success sequence" means an evidence-based
method that a person completes certain life goals in a certain order to minimize
the risk of poverty and maximize the likelihood of economic self-sufficiency.
D. Success sequence education shall be as follows:
(1) Obtain a high school diploma or high school equivalency credential.
(2) Enter into the workforce full time, either immediately following the
attainment of a high school diploma or high school equivalency credential, or
following the attainment of a postsecondary degree or credential.
(3) Marry before having children.
E. As part of any preventive program or high school program of study
provided to students in accordance with regulations adopted by the State Board
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-190 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 269
of Elementary and Secondary Education, each public and approved nonpublic
school shall provide to each student information regarding the evidence-based
findings of the success sequence to help them avoid poverty, forge a path to the
middle class, and realize the American Dream.
F. The state Department of Education may engage research institutions,
nonprofit organizations, and other interested stakeholders in an effort to
assemble pertinent guidance, make public service announcements, videos,
handouts, and other supplemental materials to assist schools in implementing
the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. This Act is known and may be cited as the "Charlie Kirk Success
Sequence Act".